Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1143.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of July 9, 1970 (P.L.484, No.164), entitled "An act relating to indemnification agreements between architects, engineers or surveyors and owners, contractors, subcontractors or suppliers and indemnification agreements relating to snow removal or ice control services," is amended to read:AN ACTRelating to indemnification agreements between architects, engineers or surveyors and owners, contractors, subcontractors or suppliers [and], indemnification agreements relating to snow removal or ice control services[.] and 12345678910111213141516171819202122 indemnification agreements relative to construction contracts , including agreements for architectural, engineering or land surveying services.Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1.2. Any provision or term in any construction contract in which a party or its agents or employes shall be indemnified , held harmless or insured for damages, claims, losses or expenses arising out of bodily injury to persons , damage to property or economic damage caused by or resulting from that party's negligence in whole or in part shall be void as against public policy and unenforceable.Section 1.3. As used in this act, the term "construction contract" means a covenant, agreement or understanding in, or in connection with any contract or agreement made and entered into by an owner, contractor, subcontractor or supplier or the agents or employes of the owner, architect, engineer, land surveyor, contractor, subcontractor or supplier relative to the design, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, maintenance, demolition, servicing or security of a building, structure, highway, railroad, appurtenance , land development or appliance. Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1143PN1262 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021